Utah statutes.
26-19-9.5.   Availability of insurance policy.

If the third party does not pay the department's claim or lien within 30 days from the date the claim or lien is received, the third party shall:

(1)  provide a written explanation if the claim is denied;

(2)  specifically describe and request any additional information from the department that is necessary to process the claim; and

(3)  provide the department or its agent a copy of any relevant or applicable insurance or benefit policy.



Enacted by Chapter 72, 2004 General Session

